Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
279G

RIDESHARING

Section

279G-1 Ridesharing arrangement; defined

279G-2 Liability for promoters of ridesharing
arrangements

279G-3 Findings

279G-4 Declaration of policy

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next